Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,109.02
Retailer; tax on average wholesale price of gasoline; credit to Highway Trust Fund; use; allocation.

(1) For tax periods beginning on and after July 1, 2009, at the time of filing the return required by section 66-6,110, the retailer shall, in addition to the other taxes provided for by law, pay a tax at the rate of five percent of the average wholesale price of gasoline calculated pursuant to section 66-489.02 for the gallons of the compressed fuel as shown by the return, except that there shall be no tax on the compressed fuel reported if it is otherwise exempted by the Compressed Fuel Tax Act.

(2) All sums of money received under this section shall be credited to the Highway Trust Fund. Credits and refunds of such tax allowed to producers, suppliers, distributors, wholesalers, or importers shall be paid from the Highway Trust Fund. The balance of the amount credited, after credits and refunds, shall be allocated as follows:

(a) Sixty-six percent to the Highway Cash Fund for the Department of Transportation;

(b) Seventeen percent to the Highway Allocation Fund for allocation to the various counties for road purposes; and

(c) Seventeen percent to the Highway Allocation Fund for allocation to the various municipalities for street purposes.

Laws 2008, LB846, § 17;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 240.